Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202619-5802
Legislative findings; act, purpose.

The Legislature finds that there is a need to address the problem of poverty in high-poverty areas, qualified census tracts, and economic redevelopment areas in the state. The purpose of the Poverty Elimination Action Plan Act is to create a comprehensive, statewide poverty elimination action plan to address the specific poverty challenges faced in such areas and tracts and promote upward mobility and sustainability.

Laws 2024, LB840, § 2.